West Virginia, session 2026, SB188.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS. §3-1-10. Party committees in office. The members of all state, congressional, senatorial, and county executive committees for political parties in office at the time this section becomes effective, and the various officers of such committees, shall hold their several offices and discharge the duties thereof until their successors are chosen and installed in accordance with the provisions of section nine of this article effective simultaneously herewith and other applicable provisions of this article, the prior provisions of section nine having become effective after the election of such members and officers for terms ending in the year 1982. The Legislature finds and declares that the prior provisions of section nine of this article should not operate to limit the terms of such members and officers before the expiration thereof as contemplated by law effective at the time of the primary election held May, 1978.The state executive committees for political parties shall, pursuant to the rules of the state executive committee, select the length of the term of office for the committee chair. The state executive committee and the newly elected chair may make nominations for vice-chair, secretary, treasurer, and committee members. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home